Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6507
Change in ownership and control, defined.

Change in ownership and control has the same meaning as described in 34 C.F.R. 600.31, which shall mean the regulation as amended on November 1, 2019, and which took effect on July 1, 2020.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 50.